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DTC B11 68/86 Short in Curtain Shield Squib LH
Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The curtain shield squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the curtain shield airbag as-
sembly LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B1168/86 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the curtain shield squib LH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B1168/86
S Short in curtain shield squib LH circuit (to B+)
S Curtain shield squib LH malfunction
S Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

S Curtain shield airbag assembly LH (Curtain shield squib LH)
S Airbag sensor assembly
S Floor No. 1 wire

HINT:
DTC B1168/86 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−706.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).

2CheckfloorNo. 1 wire (curtainshieldsquibLHcircuit).

PREPARATION:
Connect thenegative ( −) terminal cable to thebattery,andwait
at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and ICL+

of the floor No. 1 wire connector on the curtain shield air-
bag assembly LH (curtain shield squib LH) side.

OK:
Voltage:Below 1 V

NGRepairor replace floorNo. 1 wire.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(d) Using a service wire, connect ICL+ and ICL− of the floor

No. 1 wire connector on the curtain shield airbag assem-
bly LH ( curtain shield squib LH) side.

(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1168/86 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1168/86 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check curtain shield squib LH.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the curtain shield airbag assembly LH (curtain

shield squib LH) connector.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1168/86 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1168/86 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace curtain shield airbag assembly LH
(curtain shield squib LH).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


